Hawaii statutes.
Rule 1007 Testimony or written admission of
party. Contents of writings, recordings, or photographs may be proved by
the testimony or deposition of the party against whom offered or by the party's
written admission, without accounting for the nonproduction of the original. [L
1980, c 164, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

RULE 1007 COMMENTARY

This rule is identical with Fed. R. Evid. 1007. It
requires that the admission of the party-opponent be in the form of testimony
or in writing, and thus follows the suggestion contained in McCormick §242. In
addition, as the Advisory Committee's Note to Fed. R. Evid. 1007 points out,
"[t]he limitation, of course, does not call for excluding evidence of an
oral admission when nonproduction of the original has been accounted for and
secondary evidence generally has become admissible. Rule 1004 supra."

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next